Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1773.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-4-201, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-4-201. A. Pursuant to the provisions of this


section, a child may be taken into custody prior to the filing of a


petition:


1. By a peace officer or employee of the court, without a court


order if the officer or employee has reasonable suspicion that:


a. the child is in need of immediate protection due to an


imminent safety threat,



Req. No. 3398 Page 1


b. the circumstances or surroundings of the child are


such that continuation in the child’s home or in the


care or custody of the parent, legal guardian, or


custodian would present an imminent safety threat to


the child, or


c. the child, including a child with a disability, is


unable to communicate effectively about abuse, neglect


or other safety threat or is in a vulnerable position


due to the inability to communicate effectively and


the child is in need of immediate protection due to an


imminent safety threat; or


2. By an order of the district court issued upon the


application of the office of the district attorney. The application


presented by the district attorney may be supported by a sworn


affidavit which may be based upon information and belief. The


application shall state facts sufficient to demonstrate to the court


that a continuation of the child in the home or with the caretaker


of the child is contrary to the child’s welfare and there is


reasonable suspicion that:


a. the child is in need of immediate protection due to an


imminent safety threat,


b. the circumstances or surroundings of the child are


such that continuation in the child’s home or in the


care or custody of the parent, legal guardian, or

Req. No. 3398 Page 2


custodian would present an imminent safety threat to


the child, or


c. the child, including a child with a disability, is


unable to communicate effectively about abuse, neglect


or other safety threat or is in a vulnerable position


due to the inability to communicate effectively and


the child is in need of immediate protection due to an


imminent safety threat.


The application and order may be verbal and upon being advised by


the district attorney or the court of the verbal order, law


enforcement shall act on such order. If verbal, the district


attorney shall submit a written application and proposed order to


the district court within one (1) judicial day from the issuance of


the verbal order. Upon approval, the application and order shall be


filed with the court clerk; or


3. By order of the district court when the child is in need of


medical or behavioral health treatment in order to protect the


health, safety, or welfare of the child and the parent, legal


guardian, or custodian of the child is unwilling or unavailable to


consent to such medical or behavioral health treatment or other


action, the court shall specifically include in the emergency order


authorization for such medical or behavioral health evaluation or


treatment as it deems necessary.



Req. No. 3398 Page 3


B. 1. Any person who knowingly or wantonly provides a false


statement in an affidavit pursuant to this section shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not more


than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), by imprisonment in the county


jail not more than three (3) months, or by both such fine and


imprisonment.


2. Such person shall be subject to a civil action for damages


resulting from his or her false statement.


3. Any party may request a hearing to determine if a false


statement has been provided to the court. If a false statement has


been provided, the state shall notify all parties in the case of the


false statement and the person who provided the false statement to


the court. Such notice may be admitted as evidence in any trial or


hearing to attack the credibility of the person who gave the false


statement.


C. 1. By January 1, 2010, the Department of Human Services in


consultation with law enforcement and the district courts shall


develop and implement a system for joint response when a child is


taken into protective custody by a peace officer pursuant to


paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section. The system shall


include:


a. designation of persons to serve as contact points for


peace officers, including at least one backup contact


for each initial contact point,

Req. No. 3398 Page 4


b. a protocol for conducting a safety evaluation at the


scene where protective custody is assumed to determine


whether the child faces an imminent safety threat and,


if so, whether the child can be protected through


placement with relatives or others without the


Department assuming emergency custody,


c. the development of reception centers for accepting


protective custody of children from peace officers


when the Department is unable to respond at the scene


within a reasonable time period,


d. a protocol for conducting a safety evaluation at the


reception center within twenty-three (23) hours of the


assumption of protective custody of a child to


determine whether the child faces an imminent safety


threat and, if so, whether the child can be protected


through placement with relatives or others without the


Department assuming emergency custody, and


e. a protocol, when the child cannot safely be left in


the home, for transporting a child to the home of a


relative, kinship care home, an emergency foster care


home, a shelter, or any other site at which the


Department believes the child can be protected,


provided that the Department shall utilize a shelter


only when the home of a relative, kinship care home,

Req. No. 3398 Page 5


or emergency foster care home is unavailable or


inappropriate.


2. Beginning January 1, 2010, no child taken into protective


custody under paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section shall be


considered to be in the emergency custody of the Department until


the Department has completed a safety evaluation and has concluded


that the child faces an imminent safety threat and the court has


issued an order for emergency custody.


3. If the safety evaluation performed by the Department of a


child taken into protective custody under paragraph 1 of subsection


A of this section indicates that the child does not face an imminent


safety threat, the Department shall restore the child to the custody


and control of the parent, legal guardian, or custodian of the


child.


C. D. When an order issued by the district court pursuant to


subsection A of this section places the child in the emergency


custody of the Department of Human Services pending further hearing


specified by Section 1-4-203 of this title, an employee of the


Department may execute such order and physically take the child into


custody in the following limited circumstance:


1. The child is located in a hospital, school, or day care


facility; and





Req. No. 3398 Page 6


2. It is believed that assumption of the custody of the child


from the facility can occur without risk to the child or the


employee of the Department.


Otherwise, the order shall be executed and the child taken into


custody by a peace officer or employee of the court.


D. E. The court shall not enter a prepetition emergency custody


order removing a child from the home of the child unless the court


makes a determination:


1. That an imminent safety threat exists and continuation in


the home of the child is contrary to the welfare of the child; and


2. Whether reasonable efforts have been made to prevent the


removal of the child from the child’s home; or


3. An absence of efforts to prevent the removal of the child


from the home of the child is reasonable because the removal is due


to an emergency and is for the purpose of providing for the safety


and welfare of the child.


E. F. Whenever a child is taken into custody pursuant to this


section:


1. The child may be taken to a kinship care home or an


emergency foster care home designated by the Department, or if no


such home is available, to a children’s shelter located within the


county where protective or emergency custody is assumed or, if there


is no children’s shelter within the county, to a children’s shelter


designated by the court;

Req. No. 3398 Page 7


2. Unless otherwise provided by administrative order entered


pursuant to subsection F G of this section, the child may be taken


before a judge of the district court or the court may be contacted


verbally for the purpose of obtaining an order for emergency


custody. The court may place the child in the emergency custody of


the Department or some other suitable person or entity pending


further hearing specified by Section 1-4-203 of this title;


3. The child may be taken directly to or retained in a health


care facility for medical treatment, when the child is in need of


emergency medical treatment to maintain the child’s health, or as


otherwise directed by the court; or


4. The child may be taken directly to or retained in a


behavioral health treatment facility for evaluation or inpatient


treatment, in accordance with the provisions of the Inpatient Mental


Health and Substance Abuse Treatment of Minors Act, when the child


is in need of behavioral health care to preserve the child’s health,


or as otherwise directed by the court; and


5. Unless otherwise provided by administrative order entered


pursuant to subsection F G of this section, the district court of


the county where the custody is assumed shall be immediately


notified, verbally or in writing, that the child has been taken into


custody. If notification is verbal, written notification shall be


sent to the district court within one (1) judicial day of such


verbal notification.

Req. No. 3398 Page 8


F. G. The court may provide, in an administrative order issued


pursuant to this section, for the disposition of children taken into


custody and notification of the assumption of such custody.


1. Such order or rule shall be consistent with the provisions


of subsection E F of this section and may include a process for


release of a child prior to an emergency custody hearing. The


administrative order shall not include a provision to modify


protective custody of a child to emergency custody of the Department


upon admission of a child to a shelter; and


2. The administrative order may require joint training of peace


officers and Department staff deemed necessary by the court to carry


out the provisions of the administrative order.


G. H. No child taken into custody pursuant to this section


shall be confined in any jail, adult lockup, or adult or juvenile


detention facility.


H. I. When a determination is made by the Department that there


is a significant risk of abuse or neglect, but there is not an


imminent safety threat to the child, the Department may recommend a


court-supervised and Department-monitored in-home placement. The


Department shall assist the family in obtaining the services


necessary to maintain the in-home care and correct the conditions


leading to the risk determination.


I. J. Any peace officer, employee of the court, or employee of


the Department is authorized to transport a child when acting

Req. No. 3398 Page 9


pursuant to this section. Such persons and any other person acting


under the direction of the court, who in good faith transports any


child or carries out duties pursuant to this section, shall be


immune from civil or criminal liability that may result by reason of


such act. For purposes of any proceedings, civil or criminal, the


good faith of any such person shall be presumed. This provision


shall not apply to damage or injury caused by the willful, wanton or


gross negligence or misconduct of a person.


J. K. A parent or person responsible for the child who is


arrested on a charge or warrant other than child abuse or neglect or


an act of child endangerment may designate another person to take


physical custody of the child. Upon this request, the peace officer


may release the child to the physical custody of the designated


person.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3398 BLB 1/14/2026 4:23:27 PM















Req. No. 3398 Page 10